Utah statutes.
53-5-705.   Temporary permit to carry concealed firearm -- Denial, suspension, or revocation -- Appeal.

(1)  The bureau or its designated agent may issue a temporary permit to carry a concealed firearm to a person who:

(a)  has applied for a permit under Section 53-5-704;

(b)  has applied for a temporary permit under this section; and

(c)  meets the criteria required in Subsections (2) and (3).

(2)  To receive a temporary permit under this section, the applicant shall demonstrate in writing to the satisfaction of the bureau extenuating circumstances that would justify issuing a temporary permit.

(3)  A temporary permit may not be issued under this section until preliminary record checks regarding the applicant have been made with the National Crime Information Center and the bureau to determine any criminal history.

(4) (a)  A temporary permit is valid only for a maximum of 90 days or any lesser period specified by the bureau, or until a permit under Section 53-5-704 is issued to the holder of the temporary permit, whichever period is shorter.

(b)  The provisions of Subsections 76-10-504(1) and (2) and Section 76-10-505 do not apply to a person issued a temporary permit under this section during the time period for which the temporary permit is valid.

(5)  The bureau may deny, suspend, or revoke a temporary permit prior to expiration if the commissioner determines:

(a)  the circumstances justifying the temporary permit no longer exist; or

(b)  the holder of the temporary permit does not meet the requirements for a permit under Section 53-5-704.

(6) (a)  The denial, suspension, or revocation of a temporary permit shall be in writing and shall include the reasons for the action.

(b)  The bureau's decision to deny, suspend, or revoke a temporary permit may not be appealed to the board.

(c)  Denial, suspension, or revocation under this subsection is final action for purposes of judicial review under Section 63G-4-402.



Amended by Chapter 62, 2010 General Session

